Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 5. University Retirement Programs.

Sec. 14.40.660.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.010.]

Sec. 14.40.661.
Authority of board.

The board may establish and maintain university retirement programs for eligible employees in which retirement and death benefits are provided through the purchase of annuity contracts, either fixed, variable, or a combination of fixed and variable. Participation in a university retirement program is in place of participation in a state retirement system. The university may establish retirement programs for new employees in a participating position at any time. Retirement programs must be optional.

The board shall

provide for the administration of the retirement programs, including procedures for resolving complaints from participating employees;

designate the company or companies to which payment of the contributions required under AS

14.40.691

may be made, after considering the

nature and extent of the rights and benefits that the contracts will provide to employees who elect to participate and to their beneficiaries;

relation of the contractual rights and benefits to the contributions to be made under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

;

suitability of the contractual rights and benefits to the needs and interests of employees who participate and to the interest of the university in the employment and retention of employees;

ability of the designated company or companies to provide rights and benefits under the contracts; and

efficacy of the contracts in the recruitment and retention of faculty and administrators;

take other actions required to ensure that the retirement programs comply with applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. 401 — 417 (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 38 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.670.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.015.]

Sec. 14.40.671.
Participation.

An employee in a participating position may elect to participate in a university retirement program or to participate in the appropriate state retirement system. Eligibility to participate in a program begins on an employee’s appointment to a participating position.

An election under (a) of this section to participate in a university retirement program is irrevocable. The election shall be made in writing on a form provided by the board and approved for the state by the commissioner of administration. The form must be filed with the university not later than 30 days after the date on which the employee is notified by the university that the employee is eligible to participate in the program. A copy of the form shall be delivered to the appropriate state retirement system. The election becomes irrevocable on the date it is received by the board.

Participation in a university retirement program constitutes a waiver of all rights and benefits under the state retirement systems earned on or after the effective date of the election while the employee is participating in a university retirement program.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, if a nonvested member of a state retirement system participates in a university retirement program, the employee may choose to transfer the amount in the employee’s contribution account to a university retirement program. If the employee chooses to transfer the account, the appropriate state retirement system shall pay to the university on behalf of the employee an amount equal to the balance in the account. The payment must be made within 45 days after notice of the employee’s decision to transfer the employee’s contribution account to a university retirement program is received by the state retirement system. The financial officer of the university shall immediately pay the amount received to the designated company or companies for the benefit of the employee. An employee who transfers assets under this subsection may not reclaim the corresponding service in the state retirement system if the employee is reemployed under the state retirement system.

An employee whose rights to transfer assets out of a state retirement system are subject to a qualified domestic relations order is entitled to transfer assets from the state retirement system to a university retirement program only if the requirements for receiving a refund under AS

14.25.150(b)

,

14.25.360

, AS

39.35.200(c)

, or

39.35.760

, as appropriate, are met.

If a vested member of a state retirement system elects to participate in a university retirement program, the employee ceases to be an active member of the state retirement system on the effective date of the participation in a university retirement program. The employee retains all benefits accrued in the state retirement system.

An employee who does not participate in a university retirement program under this section becomes or remains a member of the appropriate state retirement system.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the university may offer an employee who made an election not to participate in an optional university retirement program at the time the employee was eligible to participate in the program an option to enroll in a different university retirement program.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am §§ 39 — 41 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.680.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.020.]

Sec. 14.40.681.
Retirement system membership.

An employee participating in a university retirement program may not participate in a state retirement system during the time the employee is employed in a participating position. If the employee is later employed in a position covered by a state retirement system that is not a participating position, the employee may not continue to participate in a university retirement program and shall begin to participate in the state retirement system.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 42 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Secs. 14.40.685 — 14.40.690.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.025 — 14.44.030.]

Sec. 14.40.691.
Contributions.

The university shall contribute on behalf of each employee participating in the program an amount established by the board.

An employee participating in the program shall contribute to the program an amount established by the board.

The board may specify that contributions required by this section are made by a reduction in salary under 26 U.S.C. 403(b) or 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2) (Internal Revenue Code).

The financial officer of the university shall pay the contributions authorized or required by this section to the designated company or companies for the benefit of each participant.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 43 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Secs. 14.40.695 — 14.40.700.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.035 — 14.44.050.]

Sec. 14.40.701.
Benefits.

Payment of benefits to participants of the program is the responsibility of the company or companies designated by the board and is not the responsibility of the board, the university, or the state. The benefits are payable to participants or their beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the applicable retirement plan document.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 44 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.710.
Terms and provisions of Compact.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 24 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 14.40.730.
Members of commission.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 24 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 14.40.750.
Fund created.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Secs. 14.40.751 — 14.40.759.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.090 — 14.43.110.]

Sec. 14.40.760.
Limits on grants and loans.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Secs. 14.40.761 — 14.40.769.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.115 — 14.43.135.]

Sec. 14.40.770.
Renewal preference. [Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.771.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.140.]

Sec. 14.40.773.
Definitions.
[Repealed, § 6 ch 156 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 14.40.775.
Conditions of grants.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.776.
Tuition grants.
[Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.40.780.
Conditions of loans.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Secs. 14.40.781 — 14.40.786.
Limitation on grants; conditions of grants. [Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.40.790.
Eligibility of students. [Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Secs. 14.40.791 — 14.40.796.
Eligibility of students; application and certification.
[Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.40.799.
Definitions.

In AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

,

“appropriate state retirement system” means the state retirement system that includes the employee’s position;

“board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska;

“contribution account” means the member contribution account under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, the individual account under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

, the employee contribution account under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, or the individual account under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

, whichever is appropriate;

“employee” means an employee of the University of Alaska or a community college under AS 14.40;

“participating position” means a position that is a permanent position that is at least a .5 full-time appointment and is included in the applicable retirement plan document;

“program” means a university retirement program;

“state retirement system” means the teachers’ retirement system under AS 14.25 or the public employees’ retirement system under AS 39.35;

“university” means the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1989; am §§ 45 — 49 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.800.
Selection of criteria.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.801.
Fiscal and business management practices.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 246 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 14.40.710 — 14.40.720.
[Renumbered as AS 14.44.055 — 14.44.060.]